Hawaii statutes.
§88-91 Exemption from taxation and
execution. [Section effective until June 30, 2018. For section
effective July 1, 2018, see below.] The right of a person to a pension, an
annuity or a retirement allowance, to the return of contributions, the pension,
annuity or retirement allowance itself, any optional benefit or death benefit,
any other right accrued or accruing to any person under this part and the
moneys in the various funds created under this part are exempted from any tax
of the State and, except as in section 88-92 provided, shall not be subject to
execution, garnishment or any other process and shall be unassignable except as
in this part specifically provided. [L 1925, c 55, §12; am L 1933, c 81, §1; RL
1935, §7930; RL 1945, §715; RL 1955, §6-58; HRS §88-82; am L 1969, c 110, pt of
§1]

§88-91 Exemption from taxation and
execution. [Section effective July 1, 2018. For section effective until
June 30, 2018, see above.] The right of a person to a pension, an annuity
or a retirement allowance, to the return of contributions, the pension, annuity
or retirement allowance itself, any optional benefit or death benefit, any
other right accrued or accruing to any person under this part and the moneys in
the various funds created under this part are exempted from any tax of the
State and, except as provided in sections 88-92 and 88-93.5, shall not be
subject to execution, garnishment or any other process and shall be
unassignable except as in this part specifically provided. [L 1925, c 55, §12;
am L 1933, c 81, §1; RL 1935, §7930; RL 1945, §715; RL 1955, §6-58; HRS §88-82;
am L 1969, c 110, pt of §1; am L 2016, c 263, §3]

Attorney General Opinions

Power of attorney authorizing attorney to receive, endorse
and collect checks does not constitute assignment of retirement allowance
prohibited by section. Att. Gen. Op. 61-69.

To extent that divorce decrees create liens that act directly
on retirement system funds, the decrees are unenforceable. Att. Gen. Op. 79-3.

Case Notes

Section does not prevent divorce court to order a party to
maintain his former wife and children as beneficiaries under the retirement
system. 52 H. 357, 477 P.2d 620.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next